Utah statutes.
9-12-201.   Moratorium on involuntary termination for nonpayment of utility bills -- Eligibility criteria -- Department to establish and certify.

(1)  The department shall establish a program for a seasonal moratorium for involuntary termination for nonpayment by residential customers of essential utility bills.  An essential utility is a utility regulated by the Public Service Commission under Title 54, which is in the business of the retail distribution of electricity or natural gas.  A residential customer is a customer defined as in a residential class by the Public Service Commission.

(2)  A residential customer shall meet the following criteria to qualify for the program:

(a)  gross household income is less than 125% of the federal poverty level or the household has suffered a medical or other emergency, loss of employment, or is experiencing other circumstances which have resulted in a substantial loss of income;

(b)  the customer has made application to public and private energy assistance programs;

(c)  the customer is willing to make a good faith effort to pay these utility bills on a consistent basis; and

(d)  any additional information required by the department.

(3)  A residential customer may file with a local department office an affidavit attesting eligibility under the criteria in Subsection (2).  The department shall certify that the customer has met the eligibility requirements and forward a copy of the affidavit to the effected utility.

